Utah statutes.
62A-2-122.   Access to vulnerable adult abuse and neglect information.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Direct service worker" is as defined in Section 62A-5-101.

(b)  "Personal care attendant" is as defined in Section 62A-3-101.

(2)  With respect to a licensee, a certified local inspector applicant, a direct service worker, or a personal care attendant, the department may access the database created by Section 62A-3-311.1 for the purpose of:

(a) (i)  determining whether a person associated with a licensee, with direct access to vulnerable adults, has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation; and

(ii)  informing a licensee that a person associated with the licensee has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation;

(b) (i)  determining whether a certified local inspector applicant has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation; and

(ii)  informing a local government that a certified local inspector applicant has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation;

(c) (i)  determining whether a direct service worker has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation; and

(ii)  informing a direct service worker or the direct service worker's employer that the direct service worker has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation; or

(d) (i)  determining whether a personal care attendant has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation; and

(ii)  informing a person described in Subsections 62A-3-101 (9)(a)(i) through (iv) that a personal care attendant has a supported or substantiated finding of:

(A)  abuse;

(B)  neglect; or

(C)  exploitation.

(3)  After receiving identifying information for a person under Subsection 62A-2-120(1), the department shall process the information for the purposes described in Subsection (2).

(4)  The department shall adopt rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, consistent with this chapter and Title 62A, Chapter 3, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, or Exploitation of a Vulnerable Adult, defining the circumstances under which a person may have direct access or provide services to vulnerable adults when the person is listed in the statewide database of the Division of Aging and Adult Services created by Section 62A-3-311.1 as having a supported or substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

